Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no elected official or the spouse of an elected official may be employed at a private entity, enter a contract with a private entity, be paid for services provided to a private entity, or have any other direct or indirect beneficial interest in a private entity, if that private entity receives state funding.(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit employment at a public agency.(3) Regardless of the definitions in RCW 42.52.010, the following definitions apply to this section:(a) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.(b) "Beneficial interest" means a financial interest or the right to enjoy profit, benefit, or advantage from any contract, loan agreement, property, or other transaction or business of or with a private entity.(c) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.(d) "Private entity" means any nonpublic individual firm, corporation, association, partnership, consortium, joint venture, nonprofit organization, and any other nonpublic entity.--- END ---